Utah statutes.
17-53-225 (Superseded 05/01/13).   County legislative body may adopt Utah Procurement Code -- Retention of records.

(1)  A county legislative body may adopt any or all of the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, or the rules promulgated pursuant to that code.

(2)  Whenever any county is required by law to receive bids for purchases, construction, repairs, or any other purpose requiring the expenditure of funds, that county shall keep on file all bids received, together with proof of advertisement by publication or otherwise, for:

(a)  at least three years following the letting of any contract pursuant to those bids; or

(b)  three years following the first advertisement for the bids, if all bids pursuant to that advertisement are rejected.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

